Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-2005
Legislative findings.

As a result of the recent federal court ruling in National Parks and Conservation Association v. National Park Service and in order to maintain an aspect of local control over the Niobrara scenic river corridor, the Legislature finds that there is a need to reconstitute the existing Niobrara Council with the express authority and responsibility to manage the Niobrara scenic river corridor in conjunction with the National Park Service. The purpose of the Niobrara Scenic River Act is to effectuate changes in the council necessary to ensure the continuation of the cooperative management relationship between the Niobrara Council and the National Park Service so that local participation and control over this valuable natural resource can be maintained.

Laws 2000, LB 1234, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 42.